Hawaii statutes.
§440-7 Other employees. Subject to
chapter 76, the department of commerce and consumer affairs may employ clerks,
inspectors, and other employees as it deems necessary. [L 1929, c 216, §§7, 9;
RL 1935, §6995; RL 1945, §7556; am L 1949, c 264, §3; am L 1951, c 307, §3; RL
1955, §165-7; am L 1967, c 85, §1; HRS §440-7; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983,
c 241, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §47; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next